Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Community Corrections Programs

196.700.
Definitions for KRS 196.700 to 196.735.

As used in KRS 196.700 to 196.735, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the Kentucky State Corrections Commission created in KRS 196.701;

“Community corrections program” means a local government agency, private nonprofit, or charitable organization within the judicial circuit which shall perform one (1) or more of the following:

Prepare community penalties plans;

Directly provide, arrange, or contract with public and private agencies for sentencing services for offenders; and

Monitor the progress of offenders placed on community penalty plans or who receive sentencing services through provisions of KRS 196.700 to 196.735;

“Community corrections programs plan” means a written plan for the development, implementation, operation, and improvement of a community corrections program;

“Community penalties plan” means a plan presented in writing to the sentencing judge which provides a detailed description of and rationale for the targeted offender’s proposed sentence to a community corrections program or to one (1) or more special programs, conditions of probation, community punishments, or sanctions in lieu of lengthy incarceration;

“Conditions of supervision” means conditions of probation, parole, mandatory reentry supervision, or other form of post-prison supervision;

“Judicial circuit” means the circuits prescribed by KRS 23A.020;

“Supervised individual” means an individual placed on probation by a court or serving a period of parole or other form of post-release supervision; and

“Targeted offenders” means persons charged with or convicted of one (1) or more felonies who under application of law are eligible for probation or suspension of sentence.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 255, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2003, ch. 71, § 7, effective June 24, 2003; 2011, ch. 2, § 70, effective June 8, 2011.

196.701.
Kentucky State Corrections Commission — Membership.

To develop and implement a statewide strategic plan for the state and community corrections programs, the Kentucky State Corrections Commission is created and is attached to the Office of the Secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet. The commission shall consist of twenty-three (23) members as follows:

The secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or his or her designee in writing;

The commissioner of the Department of Corrections or his or her designee in writing;

The deputy commissioner of the Office of Community Services and Facilities;

The deputy commissioner of the Office of Adult Institutions;

The director of the Division of Parole and Victim Services or his or her designee in writing;

The executive director of the Office of Legislative and Intergovernmental Services of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet or his or her designee in writing;

Two (2) Circuit Court Judges appointed by the Chief Justice;

A county judge/executive appointed by the Governor;

A county jailer appointed by the Governor;

A Commonwealth’s attorney appointed by the Governor;

A practicing attorney appointed by the Governor;

A victim, as that term is defined in KRS 49.280, appointed by the Governor;

Four (4) service providers from the field of mental health, substance abuse treatment, or vocational and educational training, appointed by the Governor;

A public member who is qualified to express the views of organized labor, appointed by the Governor;

A public member who is qualified to express the views of business and industry, appointed by the Governor;

The public advocate or his or her designee in writing; and

Three (3) at-large members appointed by the Governor.

The terms of those members appointed by the appointing authority shall be three (3) years. These members shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority and shall be eligible for reappointment. The appointed members may be removed for cause. All others serve during their terms of office. If there is a vacancy, the appointing authority shall immediately make an appointment effective for the unexpired term.

The chairperson of the commission shall be the secretary of justice and public safety. The commissioner of the Department of Corrections shall serve as the vice chairperson who shall preside and exercise the functions of the chairperson during absence or disability of the chairperson.

Regular meetings of the commission shall be held at least once every four (4) months at a place, day, and hour determined by the commission. Special meetings shall be held when needed as determined by the chairperson. If five (5) or more members of the commission request in writing that the chairperson call a special meeting, then the chairperson shall call a special meeting.

Members of the commission shall receive reimbursement for necessary expenses for attendance at official commission meetings or public hearings. The administrative functions of the commission shall be performed by a full-time employee of the department who is selected by the commissioner. All public members of the commission shall, in addition to expenses, receive twenty-five dollars ($25) per day for attending each meeting.

HISTORY:
Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2003, ch. 71, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2007, ch. 85, § 227, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 72, § 2, effective June 25, 2013; 2017 ch. 74, § 93, effective June 29, 2017.

196.702.
Functions of the commission.

The commission shall:

Develop a statewide strategic plan for the development and implementation of goals and objectives, target populations, and program criteria for community corrections programs;

Conduct, in collaboration with community corrections boards, a statewide assessment of community corrections programs;

Award all grant moneys to community corrections programs;

Review community correction program plans and their implementation to ensure compliance with the statewide strategic plan, including the following goals:

Effectiveness of community corrections programs in maintaining public safety;

Reduction of local commitments to the department;

Reduction in the rate of recidivism; and

Reduction in revocations of probation and parole;

Provide technical assistance, support, and training to local boards;

Submit an annual report no later than September 1 of each year to the commissioner, the Governor, and the General Assembly which includes at least the following information:

The status of the implementation of the statewide strategic plan;

The effectiveness of community corrections programs in achieving the goals outlined in subsection (4) of this section; and

An accounting of the distribution of grants and other funds;

Administer the provisions of KRS 196.700 to 196.735;

Advise the Governor and the commissioner concerning correctional policy and programs, including particularly the following:

The need for, and the development of, new or specialized institutions, facilities, or programs;

The need for, and the effectuation of, collaboration and liaison within the department, and between the department and community agencies and resources, including the bench and bar, in order to promote the readjustment and rehabilitation of offenders in institutions or under parole or probation supervision in the community; and

The need for, and the development of, useful research in penology, correctional treatment, criminal law, or in the disciplines relevant thereto; and

Establish a Parole Board Nominating Committee which shall:

Include five (5) ex officio members of the commission:

The secretary of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, who shall serve as chairperson of the committee;

The commissioner of the Department of Corrections, who shall serve as the vice chairperson of the committee;

The director of the Division of Parole and Victim Services;

The deputy commissioner of the Office of Adult Institutions; and

The deputy commissioner of the Office of Community Services and Facilities;

Include ten (10) other members of the commission:

Two (2) Circuit Judges;

Two (2) service providers with backgrounds in mental health or education;

A person representing the views of business and industry;

A person representing the views of organized labor;

A practicing attorney; and

Three (3) at-large members;

Publicize vacancies and impending term expirations on the Parole Board in accordance with standards set forth in KRS 424.180;

Submit the names of three (3) candidates to the commission for every vacancy or expired term on the Parole Board;

Forward a statement of qualifications of each nominee to the commission along with the nomination. This statement shall identify the experience which meets the qualifications for Parole Board membership outlined in KRS 439.320(1); and

Maintain the statement of qualifications as a public record in accordance with KRS 61.870 to 61.884.

History.
Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 71, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2007, ch. 85, § 228, effective June 26, 2007; 2013, ch. 72, § 3, effective June 25, 2013.

196.703.
Inspection powers of commission.

The commission or one (1) or more of its members may visit and inspect any state penal institution and may inform and advise the commissioner of the Department of Corrections in regard to the institution’s physical or other condition, its discipline, management, and program, and its general adequacy or inadequacy. The commission or a majority of its members shall have full access to the grounds and buildings and to the books and records belonging or relating to the institution, as well as the right to subpoena witnesses, take proof, or hear testimony under oath relating to the institution.

History.
Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 85, § 229, effective June 26, 2007.

196.704.
Commission’s duties relating to Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program.

For a Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Program (PIECP) administered pursuant to KRS 197.105, the Kentucky State Corrections Commission shall:

Develop a statewide strategic plan for the development and implementation of goals, objectives, and criteria for Prison Industry Enhancement Certification Programs (PIECPs);

Conduct a statewide assessment of business opportunities for the Kentucky Correctional Industries operating locations and private business opportunities;

Conduct an assessment of any private business that applies to partner with PIECPs;

Review any information provided to the commission by companies, organized labor, the Department of Corrections, or any agency of state government in regard to:

Potential job displacements relating to PIECPs;

Appropriate leased-labor pay rates for proposed business participants;

Opportunities to partner with businesses;

Reduction in the rate of recidivism; and

Business plans presented to the commission;

Provide technical assistance and support to potential partners;

Submit an annual report no later than September 1 of each year to the commissioner, the Governor, and the General Assembly, which shall include at least the following information:

The status of the implementation of the statewide strategic plan;

The effectiveness of the commission in achieving the goals outlined in this section; and

An accounting of the distribution of profits and losses for the fiscal year;

Advise the Governor and the commissioner concerning PIECPs’ policies and programs, including particularly the following:

The need for, and the development of, new or specialized facilities or programs;

The need for, and the effectuation of, collaboration and liaison within the department and between the department and community agencies and resources, including the bench and bar, in order to promote the readjustment and rehabilitation of offenders in institutions; and

The need for, and the development of, useful research in development of PIECPs; and

Promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A for businesses and the operating procedures of the Kentucky State Corrections Commission, and the procedures for addressing the handling of injury to inmates participating in the PIECPs, such as workers’ compensation insurance or another program.

HISTORY:
2017 ch. 158, § 28, effective June 29, 2017.

196.705.
Administration of programs by Kentucky State Corrections Commission — Purposes of programs.

The purposes of the commission and community corrections programs shall be to:

Provide the judicial system with sentences to be used in lieu of incarceration;

Develop community-based sentencing alternatives to incarceration for certain individuals convicted of a felony;

Monitor and enforce the payment of restitution to victims of crime and the community through financial reimbursement, community service, or both;

Stimulate local involvement in community corrections programs to assure that they are specifically designed to meet the needs of the sentencing court and the community; and

Reduce expenditures of state funds by increasing community-based sentencing, reducing the rate of recidivism, and reducing revocations of probation and parole.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 255, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 227, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 2003, ch. 71, § 3, effective June 24, 2003.

196.710.
Awarding of grants — Criteria.

The commission shall award grants to community corrections programs in accordance with the policies established by KRS 196.700 to 196.735 and in accordance with any laws enacted or promulgated for that purpose, including any branch budget bill and appropriation provisions.

Grants shall be awarded to community corrections programs whose community corrections program plans meet the requirements set forth in KRS 196.720 and which, in the commission’s judgment, promise to meet the goals set forth in KRS 196.700 to 196.735. Grants shall be awarded to encourage a range of services in each judicial circuit.

Grants may be awarded only to community corrections programs which have established community corrections boards as provided in KRS 196.725 unless the commission determines that the community corrections program is governed by a board which will serve the same functions as described in KRS 196.700 to 196.735, and that establishment of a new or additional board as described in KRS 196.725 would impose an administrative burden upon or pose a conflict of interest for the program.

Grants shall not be awarded to programs that have failed to accomplish the goals set forth in KRS 196.702(4) and that show no promise of doing so in the future, as determined pursuant to KRS 196.735.

Preference in funding may be given to judicial circuits in which programs and services do not exist or are largely inadequate.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 255, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 387, § 28, effective July 15, 1994; 2003, ch. 71, § 4, effective June 24, 2003.

196.715.
Services for targeted offenders — Assessment of victims’ needs.

A community corrections program shall be responsible for providing services for targeted offenders which shall include one (1) or more of the following:

Preparing detailed community penalty plans for presentation to the prosecution, the sentencing judge, and by the offender’s attorney.

Providing treatment, punishment, management, supervision, rehabilitation, mentoring, employment, and other services to targeted offenders, or contracting or arranging with public or private agencies for services for targeted offenders, as described in the community corrections plan.

Monitoring the progress of offenders under community penalty plans.

A community corrections program shall be responsible for assessing the needs of victims for restitution or other types of assistance resulting from the crime, and for tailoring community-based sanctions for the offender which correspond to the needs of the victim and the community.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 255, § 4, effective July 14, 1992.

196.720.
Plan requirements.

Community corrections programs applying for grants under KRS 196.700 to 196.735 shall prepare a community corrections program plan for the judicial circuit, as prescribed by the commission. More than one (1) community corrections program plan may be prepared, submitted, and approved for any one (1) judicial circuit. The plan shall include:

Objectives of the community corrections program described in the community corrections program plan.

Realistic goals for reduction of offenders committed to prison for each county within the judicial circuit, and a system of monitoring the number of commitments to prison.

Procedures for identifying targeted offenders, and a plan for referral of targeted offenders to the community corrections program.

Procedures for preparing and presenting community penalty plans to the court, when applicable.

Procedures for obtaining services from existing public or private agencies, and a detailed budget for staff, contracted services, and all other costs.

Procedures for monitoring the progress of offenders on community penalty plans and for cooperating with the probation personnel who have supervisory responsibility for the offender, when applicable.

Procedures for returning offenders who do not comply with their community penalty plan to court for action by the court.

Procedures for evaluating the program’s effect on numbers of prison commitments and revocations of probation and parole.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 255, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 2003, ch. 71, § 5, effective June 24, 2003.

196.725.
Community corrections boards — Membership — Meetings — Duties.

Each community corrections program shall establish a community corrections board to provide direction and assistance to the community corrections program in the design, implementation and evaluation of the community corrections program plan. Community corrections boards shall be organized as nonprofit corporations under KRS Chapter 273. The community corrections board shall consist of not less than eight (8) members, and shall include, insofar as possible, judges, Commonwealth’s attorneys, defense attorneys, crime victims or survivors, community leaders, social workers, law-enforcement officers, probation officers, and other interested persons. Members of the board shall receive no compensation for their duties as board members. The board shall be subject to the open meetings law and the open records law as provided for in KRS Chapter 61. The community corrections board shall meet on a regular basis, and its duties shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

Development and recommendation of an annual budget for the community corrections program;

Selection of new or additional board members;

Arranging for a private and independent annual audit; and

Development of procedures for contracting for services.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 255, § 6, effective July 14, 1992.

196.730.
Restriction on use of funds.

Funds provided for use under the provisions of KRS 196.700 to 196.735 shall not be used for the operating costs, construction, or any other costs associated with local jail confinement.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 255, § 7, effective July 14, 1992.

196.731.
Pilot projects to grant performance incentive funding to community corrections programs — Annual calculations of cost savings of state funds.

The commission may:

Approve up to five (5) pilot projects to grant performance incentive funding to community corrections programs in judicial circuits with high rates of targeted offenders who are ordered to serve a term of imprisonment; and

Approve up to five (5) pilot projects to grant performance incentive funding to community corrections programs in judicial circuits with high rates of supervised individuals who are revoked for violations of their conditions of supervision and ordered to serve a term of imprisonment.

Upon development of an approved pilot project described in subsection (1)(a) of this section, the commission shall annually calculate:

The percentage of targeted offenders in the judicial circuit for that pilot project who are convicted of a felony offense and sentenced to a term of imprisonment. This calculation shall be based on the fiscal year prior to the fiscal year in which the report is required pursuant to KRS 196.736. The baseline shall be the percentage of targeted offenders convicted and imprisoned for that judicial circuit in the fiscal year prior to the implementation of the pilot project; and

Any state expenditures that have been avoided by reductions in the baseline percentage as calculated in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

Upon development of an approved pilot project described in subsection (1)(b) of this section, the commission shall annually calculate:

The percentage of supervised individuals in the judicial circuit for that pilot project who are revoked for violations of their conditions of supervision and ordered to serve a term of imprisonment. This calculation shall be based on the fiscal year prior to the fiscal year in which the report is required pursuant to KRS 196.736. The baseline revocation percentage shall be the percentage of revocations for that judicial circuit in the fiscal year prior to the implementation of the pilot project; and

Any state expenditures that have been avoided by reductions in the revocation percentage as calculated in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

History.
Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 71, effective June 8, 2011.

196.732.
Community corrections funds — Deposit of state funds saved via pilot projects — Purposes of appropriated funds.

Beginning in the fiscal year after a pilot project has been implemented pursuant to KRS 196.731, fifty percent (50%) of any state expenditures that are avoided as calculated in KRS 196.731 shall be deposited by the department in the community corrections fund, which shall be a separate, interest-bearing account within the State Treasury. The remaining fifty percent (50%) shall be deposited in the general fund. Amounts deposited in the community corrections fund, including interest, are hereby appropriated to the commission for the following purposes:

Fifty percent (50%) to the community corrections program responsible for those savings; and

Fifty percent (50%) to the Division of Probation and Parole.

Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, any moneys remaining in the community corrections fund at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall carry forward into the next fiscal year to be used for the purposes outlined in this subsection.

None of the calculated savings shall be appropriated to the commission for distribution if:

In a pilot project developed pursuant to KRS 196.731(1)(a), there is an increase in the percentage of targeted offenders on probation who are convicted of a new felony offense and sentenced to a term of imprisonment; or

In a pilot project developed pursuant to KRS 196.731(1)(b), there is an increase in the percentage of supervised individuals who are convicted of a new felony offense.

The moneys appropriated pursuant to this section shall be used to supplement, not supplant, any other state or county appropriations for probation, parole or other post-prison supervision services, or community corrections programs.

Moneys received through appropriations pursuant to this section and KRS 196.731 shall be used for the following purposes:

Implementing evidence-based practices;

Creating, increasing, or improving the availability of risk reduction and treatment programs and interventions, including substance abuse treatment programs, for supervised individuals;

Paying the costs of global positioning monitoring system for offenders of at least medium risk; and

Increasing the number of probation and parole staff, including equipment and office space the officers and staff may need.

History.
Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 72, effective June 8, 2011.

196.735.
Annual evaluation — Renewal or continuation of programs.

The commission shall evaluate each community corrections program on an annual basis to determine the degree to which the program has accomplished the goals set forth in KRS 196.702(4). The commission shall not renew or continue a program that has failed to accomplish those goals and that shows no promise of doing so in the future, after allowing for changes in the number of convictions.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 255, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 2003, ch. 71, § 6, effective June 24, 2003.

196.736.
Annual report on implementation of pilot projects instituted pursuant to KRS 196.731.

The Kentucky State Corrections Commission shall submit an annual report on the implementation and results of any pilot projects developed pursuant to KRS 196.731 to the Legislative Research Commission, the Chief Justice, and the Governor on or before September 1 of each year. The report shall also include the calculations made pursuant to KRS 196.731 and the resulting performance incentive funding appropriated, if any.

History.
Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 73, effective June 8, 2011.